Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-966.01
Role and mission; legislative change; conditions.

After January 1, 1995, the Legislature shall not change the role and mission provisions in this section and sections 85-917 to 85-966 unless and until a proposal for such change has first been reviewed by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education and its recommendations on such proposal have been given to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (2) of section 85-1412, section 85-1414, or otherwise.

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 11;

Laws 2003, LB 7, § 4.